Maryland, session 2026, HB0331.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
9–1701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(q) “Recycling” means any process in which recyclable materials are collected,
separated, or processed and returned to the marketplace in the form of raw materials or
products.

HOUSE BILL 331 3
9–1702.
(a) There is an Office of Recycling created within the Department.
(d) The Office shall:
(1) Assist the counties in developing an acceptable recycling plan required
under § 9–1703 of this subtitle and § 9–505 of this title, including technical assistance to
the local governments;
(2) Coordinate the efforts of the State to facilitate the implementation of
the recycling goals at the county level;
(3) Review all recycling plans submitted as part of a county plan as
required under § 9–505 of this title and advise the Secretary on the adequacy of the
recycling plan;
(4) Administer the Statewide Electronics Recycling Program under Part IV
of this subtitle;
(5) Promote the development of markets for recycled materials and
recycled products in the State in accordance with § 9–1702.1 of this subtitle;
(6) Review and approve plans and annual reports, including the paint
stewardship assessment, submitted in accordance with a Paint Stewardship Program
established under Part V of this subtitle; [and]
(7) Review and approve, in consultation with the producer responsibility
advisory council established under § 9–2503 of this title, producer responsibility plans and
annual reports submitted in accordance with Subtitle 25 of this title; AND
(8) ADMINISTER THE MARYLAND BEVERAGE CONTAINER
RECYCLING REFUND AND LITTER REDUCTION PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER §
9–1739 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
9–1707.
(f) (1) There is a State Recycling Trust Fund.
(2) The Fund shall consist of:
(i) The newsprint recycling incentive fee;
(ii) The telephone directory recycling incentive fee collected under §
9–1709 of this subtitle;

HOUSE BILL 331
(iii) The covered electronic device manufacturer registration fee
collected under § 9–1728 of this subtitle;
(iv) The Paint Stewardship Program plan and annual report review
fees collected under § 9–1733(b) and (h) of this subtitle;
(v) Any fees collected from producer responsibility organizations
under § 9–1702.2 of this subtitle or Subtitle 25 of this title;
(VI) FEES AND PENALTIES TRANSFERRED TO THE FUND UNDER
§§ 9–1744 AND 9–1755 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
[(vi)] (VII) All fines and penalties collected under this subtitle and §
9–2512 of this title;
[(vii)] (VIII) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund; and
[(viii)] (IX) Any other money from any other source accepted for the
benefit of the Fund.
(3) The Secretary shall administer the Fund.
(4) The Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately and the Comptroller shall
account for the Fund.
(5) (I) [At] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, AT the end of each fiscal year, any unspent or unencumbered balance in the
Fund that exceeds $2,000,000 shall revert to the General Fund of the State in accordance
with § 7–302 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(II) THE FUNDS TRANSFERRED TO THE FUND UNDER
PARAGRAPH (2)(VI) OF THIS SUBSECTION ARE NOT SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE
STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE AND MAY NOT REVERT TO THE
GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(6) In accordance with the State budget, the Fund shall be used only:
(i) To provide grants to the counties to be used by the counties to
develop and implement local recycling plans;
(ii) To provide grants to counties that have addressed methods for
the separate collection and recycling of covered electronic devices in accordance with §
9–1703(c)(1) of this subtitle;

HOUSE BILL 331 5
(iii) To provide grants to municipalities to be used by the
municipalities to implement local covered electronic device recycling programs;
(iv) To cover the costs of the Paint Stewardship Program plan review
under § 9–1733(b) of this subtitle, the annual report review under § 9–1733(h) of this
subtitle, and associated costs for Program compliance oversight;
(v) In accordance with paragraph (7) of this subsection, to cover the
costs of a statewide recycling needs assessment conducted under § 9–1702.2 of this subtitle;
(vi) In accordance with paragraph (7) of this subsection, to cover the
costs of producer responsibility plan review, oversight, and enforcement under Subtitle 25
of this title; [and]
(VII) IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (8) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, TO COVER THE COSTS OF ADMINISTERING, MONITORING,
EVALUATING, AND ENFORCING THE MARYLAND BEVERAGE CONTAINER
RECYCLING REFUND AND LITTER REDUCTION PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER §
9–1739 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
[(vii)] (VIII) To carry out the purposes of the land management
administration.
(7) (i) There is a separate account within the Fund[.
(ii) The separate account shall consist] CONSISTING of:
1. Any fees collected from producer responsibility
organizations under § 9–1702.2 of this subtitle or Subtitle 25 of this title; and
2. All fines and penalties collected under § 9–2512 of this
title.
[(iii)] (II) The separate account shall be used only for the costs of
statewide recycling needs assessments conducted under § 9–1702.2 of this subtitle and
producer responsibility plan review, oversight, and enforcement under Subtitle 25 of this
title.
(8) (I) THERE IS A SEPARATE ACCOUNT WITHIN THE FUND
CONSISTING OF THE FUNDS SPECIFIED IN PARAGRAPH (2)(VI) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(II) THE SEPARATE ACCOUNT SHALL BE USED ONLY:
1. TO COVER THE COSTS OF ADMINISTERING,
MONITORING, EVALUATING, AND ENFORCING THE MARYLAND BEVERAGE

HOUSE BILL 331
CONTAINER RECYCLING REFUND AND LITTER REDUCTION PROGRAM
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–1739 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
2. TO COMPENSATE LOCAL GOVERNMENTS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1748 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
3. TO MEET OR EXCEED THE PERFORMANCE TARGETS
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–1740 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
[(8)] (9) (i) The Treasurer shall invest the money in the Fund in the
same manner as other State money may be invested.
(ii) Any investment earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the
General Fund of the State.
9–1735. RESERVED.
9–1736. RESERVED.
PART VI. MARYLAND BEVERAGE CONTAINER RECYCLING REFUND AND LITTER
REDUCTION PROGRAM.
9–1737.
(A) IN THIS PART THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “ACCOUNT–BASED BULK PROCESSING PROGRAM” MEANS A
PROGRAM THAT:
(I) UTILIZES A SYSTEM OF CUSTOMER ACCOUNTS AND A
MECHANISM TO ASSOCIATE REDEEMED REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS WITH
THE APPROPRIATE CUSTOMER ACCOUNT;
(II) CONSOLIDATES THE REDEEMED REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE
CONTAINERS FOR BULK SORTING WHILE COLLECTING DATA ABOUT THE
CONTAINERS;
(III) FULLY PREPARES REDEEMED REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE
CONTAINERS FOR SALE TO RECYCLERS; AND
(IV) COLLECTS DATA TO SUPPORT AN ACCOUNTING OF THE
REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS, INCLUDING THE DEPOSITS, FEES, AND
POUNDS OF MATERIAL PRODUCED THAT ARE ASSOCIATED WITH THE REDEEMABLE

HOUSE BILL 331 7
BEVERAGE CONTAINERS.
(2) “ACCOUNT–BASED BULK PROCESSING PROGRAM” INCLUDES A
BAG DROP PROGRAM IF THE BAG DROP PROGRAM IS A COMPONENT OF THE
ACCOUNT–BASED BULK PROCESSING PROGRAM.
(C) “ADVISORY COUNCIL” MEANS THE REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE
CONTAINER RECYCLING REFUND ADVISORY COUNCIL ESTABLISHED UNDER §
9–1753 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) “BAG DROP PROGRAM” MEANS A PROGRAM THAT ALLOWS A CUSTOMER
TO:
(1) DROP OFF EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS IN A BAG
OR OTHER RECEPTACLE AT ONE OR MORE LOCATIONS FOR A REFUND; AND
(2) HAVE THE CORRESPONDING REFUND PLACED INTO AN ACCOUNT
HELD FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE CUSTOMER IN A MANNER THAT ALLOWS THE
CUSTOMER TO OBTAIN THE REFUND OR REFUND RECEIPT WITHIN A SPECIFIED
NUMBER OF DAYS AFTER THE DROP–OFF.
(E) (1) “BEVERAGE” MEANS ANY DRINKABLE LIQUID INTENDED FOR
HUMAN ORAL CONSUMPTION.
(2) “BEVERAGE” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) DRUGS REGULATED UNDER THE FEDERAL FOOD, DRUG,
AND COSMETIC ACT; AND
(II) INFANT FORMULA.
(F) (1) “BEVERAGE CONTAINER” MEANS A BOTTLE, CAN, OR OTHER
CONTAINER THAT:
(I) HAS BEEN SEALED BY A MANUFACTURER;
(II) IS MADE OF GLASS, METAL, OR PLASTIC; AND
(III) AT THE TIME OF SALE, CONTAINS 3 LITERS OR LESS OF A
BEVERAGE.
(2) “BEVERAGE CONTAINER” DOES NOT INCLUDE:

HOUSE BILL 331
(I) A CARTON;
(II) A POUCH; OR
(III) ASEPTIC PACKAGING.
(G) “BEVERAGE CONTAINER REDEMPTION AND PROCESSING METHOD”
MEANS A MANUAL OR TECHNOLOGICAL METHOD FOR PROPERLY COLLECTING,
IDENTIFYING, COUNTING, OR PROCESSING EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE
CONTAINERS FOR REDEMPTION.
(H) “BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION” MEANS A
NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT IS:
(1) EXEMPT FROM TAXATION UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF THE INTERNAL
REVENUE CODE;
(2) CREATED BY PRODUCERS TO IMPLEMENT A BEVERAGE
CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP PLAN; AND
(3) APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1745
OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(I) “BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP PLAN” MEANS A PLAN
SUBMITTED TO THE DEPARTMENT UNDER § 9–1746 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(J) “CHESAPEAKE BAY TRUST” MEANS THE CHESAPEAKE BAY TRUST
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 8–1902 OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE.
(K) “DEPOSIT INITIATOR” MEANS THE FIRST DISTRIBUTOR TO COLLECT A
DEPOSIT ON A BEVERAGE CONTAINER SOLD IN THE STATE.
(L) (1) “DISTRIBUTOR” MEANS A PERSON THAT SELLS BEVERAGES IN
REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS TO A RETAILER IN THE STATE.
(2) “DISTRIBUTOR” INCLUDES A PERSON THAT MANUFACTURES AND
SELLS BEVERAGES IN REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS TO A RETAILER IN THE
STATE.
(3) “DISTRIBUTOR” DOES NOT INCLUDE AIRLINES OR SHIPPING
COMPANIES THAT TRANSPORT REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS.
(M) “GRANT PROGRAM” MEANS THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER RECYCLING

HOUSE BILL 331 9
REFUND GRANT PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–1750 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(N) “LINE BREAKAGE” MEANS A BEVERAGE CONTAINER THAT:
(1) BECOMES DEFECTIVE OR DAMAGED DURING MANUFACTURING;
(2) IS NOT INTENDED TO BE SOLD; AND
(3) IS NOT ELIGIBLE FOR REDEMPTION.
(O) “MARYLAND–SPECIFIC UPC BARCODE” MEANS A UNIVERSAL PRODUCT
CODE THAT IS:
(1) UNIQUE TO BEVERAGE CONTAINERS SOLD IN THE STATE; AND
(2) USED TO DETER FRAUD AND ENSURE THE LEGITIMATE
REDEMPTION OF REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS.
(P) “MATERIAL RECOVERY FACILITY” MEANS A FACILITY LOCATED IN THE
STATE THAT COLLECTS, COMPACTS, REPACKAGES, SORTS, OR PROCESSES
SOURCE–SEPARATED MATERIALS FOR TRANSPORTATION AND RECYCLING.
(Q) (1) “ON–PREMISES SELLER” MEANS A PERSON THAT SELLS FILLED
AND UNOPENED REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS FOR ON–PREMISES
CONSUMPTION.
(2) “ON–PREMISES SELLER” INCLUDES:
(I) BARS;
(II) HOTELS;
(III) RESTAURANTS;
(IV) SPORTING VENUES;
(V) ENTERTAINMENT VENUES; AND
(VI) GAMING VENUES.
(R) “PERFORMANCE TARGETS” MEANS THE TARGETS ESTABLISHED UNDER
§ 9–1740 OF THIS SUBTITLE.

HOUSE BILL 331
(S) (1) “PRODUCER” MEANS A PERSON RESPONSIBLE FOR COMPLYING
WITH THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS PART.
(2) “PRODUCER” INCLUDES A FRANCHISOR OF A FRANCHISE
LOCATED IN THE STATE.
(3) “PRODUCER” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) THE STATE, A COUNTY, A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION, OR
ANY OTHER POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE;
(II) A CHARITABLE ORGANIZATION THAT IS TAX–EXEMPT
UNDER § 501(C)(3) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE;
(III) A SOCIAL WELFARE ORGANIZATION THAT IS TAX–EXEMPT
UNDER § 501(C)(4) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE;
(IV) A FRANCHISEE THAT OPERATES A FRANCHISE IN THE
STATE;
(V) A PERSON THAT ANNUALLY SELLS, OFFERS FOR SALE,
DISTRIBUTES, OR IMPORTS INTO THE COUNTRY FOR SALE IN THE STATE FEWER
THAN 1,000 REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS; OR
(VI) A PERSON THAT ANNUALLY SELLS, OFFERS FOR SALE, OR
DISTRIBUTES IN THE STATE REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS THAT IN
AGGREGATE GENERATE LESS THAN $5,000,000 EACH YEAR IN GLOBAL REVENUE.
(T) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE MARYLAND BEVERAGE CONTAINER
RECYCLING REFUND AND LITTER REDUCTION PROGRAM ESTABLISHED UNDER §
9–1739 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(U) “RECYCLING RATE” MEANS THE NUMBER OF NONREFILLABLE
REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS SOLD IN THE STATE THAT ARE RECYCLED
SHOWN AS A PERCENTAGE OF ALL NONREFILLABLE REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE
CONTAINERS SOLD IN THE STATE.
(V) “REDEEM” MEANS THE RETURN OF AN EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE
CONTAINER IN EXCHANGE FOR A REFUND, A VOUCHER FOR A REFUND, OR A CREDIT
TO AN ACCOUNT FOR NOT LESS THAN THE REFUND VALUE.
(W) “REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER” MEANS A BEVERAGE
CONTAINER THAT, AT THE TIME OF SALE:

HOUSE BILL 331 11
(1) CONTAINS 3 LITERS OR LESS OF A BEVERAGE;
(2) BEARS A UNIVERSAL PRODUCT CODE; AND
(3) MAY BEAR A MARYLAND–SPECIFIC UPC BARCODE FOR THE
PURPOSE OF ENSURING LEGITIMATE REDEMPTION AND DETERRING FRAUD.
(X) “REDEMPTION FACILITY” MEANS A FACILITY THAT:
(1) ACCEPTS EMPTY BEVERAGE CONTAINERS FROM A CONSUMER, A
RETAILER, OR BOTH;
(2) COLLECTS, SORTS, AND COUNTS EMPTY BEVERAGE CONTAINERS;
(3) REFUNDS THE REFUND VALUE OF EMPTY REDEEMABLE
BEVERAGE CONTAINERS IN CASH, WITH A VOUCHER, OR AS A CREDIT TO AN
ACCOUNT FOR NOT LESS THAN THE REFUND VALUE OF THE REDEEMABLE
BEVERAGE CONTAINER; AND
(4) IS LICENSED UNDER § 9–1742 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(Y) “REDEMPTION RATE” MEANS THE PERCENTAGE OF REDEEMABLE
BEVERAGE CONTAINERS SOLD IN THE STATE THAT ARE REDEEMED FOR THE
DEPOSIT VALUE.
(Z) “REFILLABLE” MEANS A BEVERAGE CONTAINER THAT IS DESIGNED AND
INTENDED TO BE REUSED AS A BEVERAGE CONTAINER AFTER BEING USED BY A
CONSUMER WITHOUT THE NEED FOR REMANUFACTURING.
(AA) (1) “RETAILER” MEANS A PERSON THAT ENGAGES IN THE SALE OF
REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS TO A CONSUMER IN THE STATE.
(2) “RETAILER” INCLUDES A PERSON THAT ENGAGES IN THE SALE OF
REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS:
(I) THROUGH A VENDING MACHINE; OR
(II) ONLINE FOR HOME OR OFFICE DELIVERY.
(BB) “REVERSE VENDING MACHINE” MEANS AN AUTOMATED DEVICE THAT:
(1) ACCEPTS ONE OR MORE TYPES OF EMPTY REDEEMABLE

HOUSE BILL 331
BEVERAGE CONTAINERS;
(2) USES A LASER SCANNER, AN OPTICAL SENSOR, A
MICROPROCESSOR, OR OTHER TECHNOLOGY TO ACCURATELY RECOGNIZE A
BEVERAGE CONTAINER’S UNIVERSAL PRODUCT CODE TO DETERMINE WHETHER THE
CONTAINER IS A REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER;
(3) ISSUES A REDEEMABLE CREDIT SLIP FOR THE REDEEMABLE
BEVERAGE CONTAINER’S REFUND VALUE;
(4) SEPARATES REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS FROM
CONTAINERS THAT ARE NOT REDEEMABLE;
(5) USES MECHANICAL COMPACTION TO CANCEL REDEEMABLE
BEVERAGE CONTAINERS THAT HAVE BEEN REDEEMED; AND
(6) COMPILES INFORMATION REGARDING THE REDEEMABLE
BEVERAGE CONTAINERS THAT HAVE BEEN REDEEMED, INCLUDING THE NUMBER OF
REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS REDEEMED.
(CC) (1) “UNIVERSAL PRODUCT CODE” OR “UPC” MEANS A STANDARD
BARCODE THAT ENCODES A NUMBER UNIQUELY ASSIGNED TO A PRODUCT FOR
IDENTIFICATION OF THE PRODUCT.
(2) “UNIVERSAL PRODUCT CODE” OR “UPC” INCLUDES:
(I) ANY INDUSTRY–ACCEPTED BARCODE USED FOR PRODUCT
IDENTIFICATION PURPOSES; AND
(II) A EUROPEAN ARTICLE NUMBER.
9–1738.
IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO:
(1) REDUCE THE VOLUME OF LITTER AND PLASTIC POLLUTION FROM
BEVERAGE CONTAINERS IN THE STATE BY ACHIEVING A REDEMPTION RATE OF AT
LEAST 90% FOR THE APPROXIMATELY 5,500,000,000 SINGLE–USE BEVERAGE
CONTAINERS SOLD ANNUALLY IN THE STATE;
(2) PROVIDE A SOURCE OF HIGH–QUALITY, FOOD–GRADE MATERIALS
FOR USE AS RECYCLED CONTENT IN BEVERAGE AND FOOD CONTAINERS;

HOUSE BILL 331 13
(3) REDUCE THE VOLUME OF BEVERAGE CONTAINERS THAT ARE
LANDFILLED OR INCINERATED IN THE STATE;
(4) REDUCE THE COSTS OF LITTER AND BEVERAGE CONTAINER
COLLECTION, RECYCLING, AND DISPOSAL INCURRED BY TAXPAYERS, COUNTIES,
AND MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS BY MAKING PRODUCERS OF BEVERAGE
CONTAINERS RESPONSIBLE FOR THE RECOVERY, RECYCLING, AND REUSE OF
BEVERAGE CONTAINERS;
(5) PROVIDE INCENTIVES FOR INCREASING THE USE OF REUSABLE
AND REFILLABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS; AND
(6) REDUCE GREENHOUSE GAS EMISSIONS ASSOCIATED WITH THE
PRODUCTION, TRANSPORTATION, PROCESSING, AND WASTE DISPOSAL OF
SINGLE–USE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS SOLD IN THE STATE.
9–1739.
THERE IS A MARYLAND BEVERAGE CONTAINER RECYCLING REFUND AND
LITTER REDUCTION PROGRAM IN THE DEPARTMENT.
9–1740.
PERFORMANCE TARGETS FOR THE PROGRAM ARE AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A 70% REDEMPTION RATE BY DECEMBER 31, 2030;
(2) A 90% REDEMPTION RATE BY DECEMBER 31, 2033;
(3) BY DECEMBER 31, 2028, ATTAINMENT OF ALL CONVENIENCE
STANDARDS IDENTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER § 9–1752 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
AND
(4) BY DECEMBER 31, 2038, AT LEAST 10% OF ALL BEVERAGE
CONTAINERS SOLD IN THE STATE ARE RETURNED AND REFILLED.
9–1741.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2029, EACH REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER SOLD IN
THE STATE SHALL INCLUDE A DEPICTION OF THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(I) THE WORD “MARYLAND” OR THE LETTERS “MD”; AND

HOUSE BILL 331
(II) 1. FOR REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS WITH A
VOLUME OF 24 FLUID OUNCES OR LESS, A REFUND VALUE OF 10 CENTS; OR
2. FOR REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS WITH A
VOLUME OF MORE THAN 24 FLUID OUNCES, A REFUND VALUE OF 15 CENTS.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADJUST THE REFUND VALUES SPECIFIED
IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES ALTERING THE REFUND
VALUES IS NECESSARY TO MEET OR EXCEED PERFORMANCE TARGETS; OR
(II) AT THE REQUEST OF A BEVERAGE CONTAINER
STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION.
(3) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2034, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
INCREASE THE REFUND VALUES SPECIFIED IN PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION
BY 5 CENTS IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT FOR 2 CONSECUTIVE
CALENDAR YEARS THE REDEMPTION RATE WAS LESS THAN 90% OF THE TOTAL
NUMBER OF BEVERAGE CONTAINERS SOLD IN THE STATE.
(B) A BEVERAGE CONTAINER DEPICTING THE INFORMATION SPECIFIED IN
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE SOLD TO A CONSUMER BEFORE
JANUARY 1, 2029.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2029:
(I) THE WHOLESALE PRICE AND THE RETAIL PRICE OF A FULL
REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER SHALL INCLUDE THE REFUND VALUE OF THE
REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER; AND
(II) A RETAILER SHALL INCLUDE ON A CUSTOMER’S SALES
RECEIPT THE REFUND VALUE OF A REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER SOLD BY
THE RETAILER TO THE CUSTOMER.
(2) THE RETAIL PRICE OF A FULL REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE
CONTAINER SOLD BY AN ON–PREMISES SELLER MAY NOT INCLUDE THE REFUND
VALUE OF THE REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER.
9–1742.

HOUSE BILL 331 15
(A) (1) THE PROGRAM SHALL PROVIDE A RANGE OF OPTIONS FOR
CUSTOMERS TO CONVENIENTLY REDEEM EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE
CONTAINERS FOR THE FULL REFUND VALUE, INCLUDING:
(I) AT A RETAILER’S PLACE OF BUSINESS THROUGH DIRECT
TAKE–BACK BY THE RETAILER, REVERSE VENDING MACHINES, A BAG DROP
PROGRAM, OR OTHER REDEMPTION METHODS;
(II) DEDICATED AND CONVENIENTLY LOCATED REDEMPTION
FACILITIES OPERATED BY RETAILERS, PUBLIC ENTITIES, OR THE BEVERAGE
CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION; AND
(III) PLACING REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER
REDEMPTION AND PROCESSING METHODS, SUCH AS REVERSE VENDING MACHINES,
BAG DROP PROGRAMS, AND ACCOUNT–BASED BULK PROCESSING PROGRAMS, IN
AREAS:
1. WITH A HIGH NUMBER OF PEDESTRIANS; AND
2. WHERE INDIVIDUALS PURCHASE OR USE BEVERAGE
CONTAINERS.
(2) THE PROGRAM SHALL PROVIDE A RANGE OF OPTIONS FOR
ON–PREMISES SELLERS TO CONVENIENTLY REDEEM EMPTY REDEEMABLE
BEVERAGE CONTAINERS FOR THE FULL REFUND VALUE, INCLUDING:
(I) AN ACCOUNT–BASED REFUND ISSUED BY THE BEVERAGE
CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION OR ITS AGENTS FOLLOWING THE
COLLECTION OF EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS BY THE BEVERAGE
CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION OR ITS AGENTS FROM THE ON–PREMISES
SELLER; OR
(II) AN ACCOUNT–BASED REFUND ISSUED BY THE OPERATOR OF
A BAG DROP PROGRAM.
(B) (1) A PERSON SHALL APPLY TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR A LICENSE TO
OPERATE A REDEMPTION FACILITY IN THE STATE.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP STANDARDS AND A
LICENSING PROCESS FOR THE ESTABLISHMENT AND OPERATION OF REDEMPTION
FACILITIES.
(C) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, A REDEMPTION

HOUSE BILL 331
FACILITY SHALL ACCEPT ALL TYPES OF EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE
CONTAINERS FOR REDEMPTION.
(D) A RETAILER OR REDEMPTION FACILITY MAY REFUSE TO ACCEPT AN
EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER THAT:
(1) IS DIRTY;
(2) IS BROKEN;
(3) CONTAINS MATERIAL FOREIGN TO THE NORMAL CONTENTS OF
THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER; OR
(4) THE RETAILER OR REDEMPTION FACILITY BELIEVES WAS NOT
SOLD IN THE STATE.
(E) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO A RETAILER WITH AT LEAST 3,000
SQUARE FEET OF SALES FLOOR SPACE AND AT LEAST 150 SQUARE FEET OF SHELF
SPACE DEDICATED TO THE DISPLAY OF REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS.
(2) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, A RETAILER
SHALL:
(I) ESTABLISH AND MAINTAIN A DEDICATED AREA AT THE
RETAILER’S PLACE OF BUSINESS TO ACCEPT EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE
CONTAINERS;
(II) ACCEPT AT THE RETAILER’S PLACE OF BUSINESS ANY
EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS RETURNED FOR REDEMPTION
DURING THE RETAILER’S BUSINESS HOURS; AND
(III) PAY TO THE REDEEMER THE REFUND VALUE FOR EACH
EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER REDEEMED.
(3) RETAILERS MAY MEET THE REQUIREMENTS IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF
THIS SUBSECTION THROUGH VARIOUS METHODS, INCLUDING:
(I) SUPPLEMENTING THE MANUAL COLLECTION AND STORING
OF REDEEMED REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS WITH A REVERSE VENDING
MACHINE, A BAG DROP PROGRAM, OR OTHER COUNTING AND SORTING METHODS;
AND
(II) GROUPING BEVERAGE CONTAINER REDEMPTION AND

HOUSE BILL 331 17
PROCESSING METHODS WITH THOSE OF OTHER RETAILERS IF:
1. THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP
ORGANIZATION APPROVES THE PROPOSAL; AND
2. THE RETAILERS PARTICIPATING IN THE GROUPED
METHODS PROVIDE CONSISTENT SERVICE, MARKETING, AND SITE REDEMPTION
LOCATIONS THAT COMPLY WITH DISTANCE PROVISIONS DETERMINED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(4) A RETAILER WITHIN AN AREA THAT MEETS THE CONVENIENCE
STANDARDS ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER § 9–1752 OF THIS
SUBTITLE MAY BE EXEMPT FROM THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION IF THE
RETAILER:
(I) IS LOCATED IN CLOSE PROXIMITY TO A REDEMPTION
FACILITY IN THAT AREA; AND
(II) SHARES THE COST OF THE OPERATION OF THE
REDEMPTION FACILITY WITH THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP
ORGANIZATION.
(5) THE DEPARTMENT MAY:
(I) SET STANDARDS FOR THE NUMBER OF REVERSE VENDING
MACHINES REQUIRED FOR RETAILERS LOCATED IN UNDERSERVED COMMUNITIES;
AND
(II) ESTABLISH A CAP FOR THE NUMBER OF EMPTY
REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS THAT MAY BE REDEEMED PER VISIT AT
SMALL RETAILERS.
(F) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, A RETAILER WITH LESS
THAN 3,000 SQUARE FEET OF SALES FLOOR SPACE OR LESS THAN 150 SQUARE FEET
OF SHELF SPACE DEDICATED TO THE DISPLAY OF REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE
CONTAINERS SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE ON–SITE CASH REFUNDS FOR THE REDEMPTION OF ANY
EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER THAT IS OF THE SAME MATERIAL AND
SIZE AS THOSE THAT ARE SOLD BY THE RETAILER IF THE EMPTY REDEEMABLE
BEVERAGE CONTAINER BEING REDEEMED IS NOT ACCEPTED BY A REVERSE
VENDING MACHINE; AND

HOUSE BILL 331
(2) POST AT THE RETAILER’S ENTRANCE THE ADDRESS OF THE
NEAREST REVERSE VENDING MACHINE OR OTHER REDEMPTION METHOD THAT
PROVIDES AN IMMEDIATE CASH REFUND FOR REDEEMING EMPTY REDEEMABLE
BEVERAGE CONTAINERS.
(G) (1) A PERSON THAT PROVIDES A REVERSE VENDING MACHINE FOR
THE REDEMPTION OF EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE AN OPTION FOR REDEEMING EMPTY REDEEMABLE
BEVERAGE CONTAINERS WHEN THE REVERSE VENDING MACHINE IS FULL, BROKEN,
OR UNDER REPAIR; AND
(II) PROVIDE AN OPTION FOR REDEEMING ANY EMPTY
REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS NOT ACCEPTED BY THE REVERSE VENDING
MACHINE.
(2) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A PROCESS FOR
SUBMITTING FOR REVIEW, APPROVING, AND MONITORING AN ACCOUNT–BASED
BULK PROCESSING PROGRAM THAT:
1. ENSURES THAT THE PROGRAM WILL ACCURATELY
REFUND DEPOSITS AND MAINTAIN AND REPORT DATA FROM EACH TRANSACTION;
AND
2. IDENTIFIES THE INFORMATION THAT MUST BE
SUBMITTED TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR APPROVAL OF THE PROGRAM.
(II) A PERSON THAT INTENDS TO PROVIDE AN ACCOUNT–BASED
BULK PROCESSING PROGRAM FOR THE REDEMPTION OF EMPTY REDEEMABLE
BEVERAGE CONTAINERS SHALL SUBMIT INFORMATION IDENTIFIED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR APPROVAL OF
THE PROGRAM.
(H) (1) REFUNDS PROVIDED FOR AN EMPTY REDEEMED REDEEMABLE
BEVERAGE CONTAINER SHALL BE:
(I) IN CASH;
(II) IN THE FORM OF A RECEIPT FROM A REVERSE VENDING
MACHINE OR ACCOUNT–BASED REDEMPTION SYSTEM, IF:
1. THE RECEIPT CAN BE EXCHANGED FOR CASH WITHIN
60 DAYS AFTER THE RECEIPT IS ISSUED; AND

HOUSE BILL 331 19
2. THERE IS NO REQUIREMENT THAT OTHER GOODS BE
PURCHASED TO RECEIVE THE CASH REFUND; OR
(III) CREDITED TO AN ACCOUNT BY THE RECEIVER OF THE
EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER SO THAT THE CONSUMER CAN
RECEIVE THE REFUND OR A REFUND RECEIPT WITHIN A SPECIFIED NUMBER OF
DAYS, AS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT, AFTER REDEEMING THE EMPTY
REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER.
(2) THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION
SHALL REIMBURSE A RETAILER FOR THE VALUE OF VALID RECEIPTS REDEEMED BY
CONSUMERS.
(I) (1) A REDEMPTION FACILITY, RETAILER, OR ANY OTHER PERSON
THAT ACCEPTS REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS FOR REDEMPTION SHALL BE
REIMBURSED BY THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION OR ITS
AGENT FOR THE HANDLING OF EACH EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER
REDEEMED.
(2) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SET A HANDLING FEE TO BE PAID
BY THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION OR ITS AGENT TO A
REDEMPTION FACILITY, RETAILER, OR ANY OTHER PERSON THAT ACCEPTS EMPTY
REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS FOR REDEMPTION.
(II) 1. THE HANDLING FEE SHALL BE SET AT AN AMOUNT
THAT COVERS THE COSTS OF COLLECTING, SORTING, PROCESSING, AND
TRANSPORTING EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS FOR RECYCLING,
REUSE, OR REFILLING.
2. THE DEPARTMENT MAY INCREASE THE HANDLING
FEE IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES AN INCREASE IS NECESSARY TO ENCOURAGE
THE ESTABLISHMENT OF MORE REDEMPTION FACILITIES.
(J) (1) AN ON–PREMISES SELLER THAT PROVIDES EMPTY REDEEMABLE
BEVERAGE CONTAINERS FOR REDEMPTION SHALL BE REIMBURSED BY THE
BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION OR ITS AGENT FOR:
(I) THE REFUNDS PAID BY THE ON–PREMISES SELLER FOR THE
EMPTY REDEEMED REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS; AND
(II) THE HANDLING OF EACH EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE
CONTAINER REDEEMED.

HOUSE BILL 331
(2) (I) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SET A MATERIAL HANDLING FEE
TO BE PAID BY THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION OR ITS
AGENT TO AN ON–PREMISES SELLER THAT PROVIDES EMPTY REDEEMABLE
BEVERAGE CONTAINERS FOR REDEMPTION.
(II) THE HANDLING FEE SHALL BE SET AT AN AMOUNT THAT
COVERS THE COSTS OF TEMPORARY STORAGE, PRELIMINARY SORTING, AND
PREPARING EACH REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER REDEEMED FOR
COLLECTION.
(3) THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION OR ITS
AGENT SHALL PROVIDE TO AN ON–PREMISES SELLER:
(I) ANY RECEPTACLES OR BAGS REQUIRED FOR THE
PRELIMINARY SORTING OF REDEEMED REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS BY
THE ON–PREMISES SELLER; AND
(II) ANY LABELS NECESSARY FOR ATTRIBUTING THE
REDEEMED REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS TO THE ON–PREMISES SELLER.
(K) A DEPOSIT INITIATOR THAT COLLECTS A DEPOSIT FROM A RETAILER,
REDEMPTION FACILITY, OR ANY OTHER PERSON THAT ACCEPTS REDEEMABLE
BEVERAGE CONTAINERS FOR REDEMPTION SHALL ACCOUNT FOR ANY DEPOSITS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1743 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(L) REDEEMED EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS SHALL BE
COLLECTED FOR RETURN TO THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP
ORGANIZATION FOR SALE AS SCRAP MATERIAL TO FINANCE THE PROGRAM.
9–1743.
(A) A DEPOSIT INITIATOR SHALL DEPOSIT ANY DEPOSITS COLLECTED
UNDER § 9–1742 OF THIS SUBTITLE INTO A DEPOSIT COLLECTION ACCOUNT THAT IS
MAINTAINED SEPARATELY FROM ALL OTHER REVENUES.
(B) THE FUNDS IN THE DEPOSIT COLLECTION ACCOUNT MAY BE USED ONLY
TO PAY THE REFUND VALUE OF AN EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER
BEING REDEEMED.
(C) A DEPOSIT INITIATOR SHALL REPORT TO THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER
STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION, AT A FREQUENCY DETERMINED BY THE
DEPARTMENT, THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:

HOUSE BILL 331 21
(1) THE NUMBER OF REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS SOLD
AND EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS REDEEMED SINCE THE LAST
REPORT WAS SUBMITTED TO THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP
ORGANIZATION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION;
(2) THE FUNDS DEPOSITED INTO THE DEPOSIT COLLECTION
ACCOUNT AND THE REFUNDS ISSUED FROM THE DEPOSIT COLLECTION ACCOUNT
SINCE THE LAST REPORT WAS SUBMITTED TO THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER
STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION;
(3) ANY INCOME EARNED ON THE FUNDS IN THE DEPOSIT
COLLECTION ACCOUNT SINCE THE LAST REPORT WAS SUBMITTED TO THE
BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION;
(4) THE BALANCE OF THE DEPOSIT COLLECTION ACCOUNT; AND
(5) ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DETERMINE THE POINT AT WHICH A
DEPOSIT BECOMES AN UNCLAIMED DEPOSIT.
(2) UNCLAIMED DEPOSITS ARE CALCULATED AS THE AMOUNT OF
FUNDS TRANSFERRED TO A DEPOSIT COLLECTION ACCOUNT THAT ARE IN EXCESS
OF THE SUM OF:
(I) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS ON THE DEPOSIT COLLECTION
ACCOUNT DURING THE TIME FOR WHICH UNCLAIMED DEPOSITS ARE BEING
CALCULATED; AND
(II) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF THE REFUND VALUE RECEIVED FOR
THE EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS REDEEMED DURING THE TIME
FOR WHICH THE UNCLAIMED DEPOSITS ARE BEING CALCULATED.
(3) A DEPOSIT INITIATOR SHALL TRANSFER ALL UNCLAIMED
DEPOSITS TO THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION AT A
FREQUENCY DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(4) THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION
SHALL:
(I) ESTABLISH A RESERVE ACCOUNT TO MANAGE ALL
UNCLAIMED DEPOSITS; AND

HOUSE BILL 331
(II) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2030, TRANSFER 10% OF ALL
UNCLAIMED DEPOSITS TO THE CHESAPEAKE BAY TRUST WITH A FREQUENCY
DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(5) THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION
SHALL USE THE FUNDS IN THE RESERVE ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO:
(I) ACHIEVE THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY STATED
IN § 9–1738 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) MEET OR EXCEED THE PERFORMANCE TARGETS
ESTABLISHED IN § 9–1740 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(6) THE UNCLAIMED DEPOSITS TRANSFERRED TO THE CHESAPEAKE
BAY TRUST UNDER PARAGRAPH (4)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE USED ONLY
FOR THE COSTS OF ADMINISTERING AND FINANCING THE GRANT PROGRAM UNDER
§ 9–1750 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
9–1744.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THIS SECTION
APPLIES TO A PRODUCER THAT SELLS, OFFERS FOR SALE, OR DISTRIBUTES
REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS IN THE STATE.
(2) (I) IF THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER IS SOLD UNDER THE
PRODUCER’S OWN BRAND OR LACKS IDENTIFICATION OF A BRAND, THE PRODUCER
IS THE PERSON THAT MANUFACTURES THE REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER.
(II) IF THE REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER IS
MANUFACTURED BY A PERSON OTHER THAN THE BRAND OWNER, THE PRODUCER IS
THE PERSON THAT IS THE LICENSEE OF A BRAND OR TRADEMARK UNDER WHICH A
REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER IS SOLD, OFFERED FOR SALE, OR
DISTRIBUTED IN THE STATE, WHETHER OR NOT THE TRADEMARK IS REGISTERED IN
THE STATE, UNLESS ANOTHER RESPONSIBLE PERSON HAS CONTRACTUALLY
ACCEPTED RESPONSIBILITY AS THE PRODUCER AND HAS JOINED THE BEVERAGE
CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION AS THE PRODUCER RESPONSIBLE FOR
THE REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER UNDER THIS SECTION.
(III) IF THERE IS NO PERSON DESCRIBED IN THIS PARAGRAPH
OVER WHOM THE STATE CAN CONSTITUTIONALLY EXERCISE JURISDICTION, THE
PRODUCER IS THE PERSON THAT IMPORTS OR DISTRIBUTES THE REDEEMABLE

HOUSE BILL 331 23
BEVERAGE CONTAINER IN THE STATE.
(3) IF ANOTHER PERSON CONTRACTUALLY ACCEPTS
RESPONSIBILITY AS A PRODUCER UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE PRODUCER MUST PROVIDE A CERTIFIED COPY OF THE CONTRACTUAL
AGREEMENT TO THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION.
(B) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2029, A PRODUCER MAY NOT SELL, OFFER FOR
SALE, OR DISTRIBUTE IN OR IMPORT INTO THE STATE A REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE
CONTAINER UNLESS THE PRODUCER:
(1) IS REGISTERED WITH THE DEPARTMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SECTION;
(2) HAS PAID THE REGISTRATION FEE UNDER SUBSECTION (F) OF
THIS SECTION; AND
(3) IS PART OF THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP
ORGANIZATION THAT:
(I) HAS BEEN APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER §
9–1745 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(II) HAS A BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP PLAN
APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER § 9–1746 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) ON OR BEFORE MARCH 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2028, THE
BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION SHALL PROVIDE TO THE
DEPARTMENT:
(1) A LIST OF EACH PRODUCER PARTICIPATING IN THE BEVERAGE
CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION; AND
(2) FOR EACH PRODUCER, THE REGISTRATION FORM REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CREATE A REGISTRATION FORM THAT
REQUIRES EACH PRODUCER PARTICIPATING IN THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER
STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION TO PROVIDE THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(I) THE NAME, PRIMARY BUSINESS ADDRESS, AND CONTACT
INFORMATION OF THE PERSON RESPONSIBLE FOR ENSURING COMPLIANCE WITH
THIS PART;

HOUSE BILL 331
(II) A LIST OF EACH BRAND OF REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE
CONTAINERS THAT THE PRODUCER INTENDS TO SELL, OFFER FOR SALE, OR
DISTRIBUTE IN THE STATE, INCLUDING THE SIZE AND MATERIAL OF THE
REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS FOR EACH BRAND;
(III) FOR EACH REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER SPECIFIED
IN THE REGISTRATION, WHETHER THE REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER:
1. IS REFILLABLE; AND
2. DEPICTS A UPC OR MARYLAND–SPECIFIC UPC
BARCODE;
(IV) HOW EACH PRODUCER WILL PREVENT THE FRAUDULENT
SALE AND REDEMPTION OF REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS THAT WERE NOT
SOLD IN THE STATE;
(V) THE NUMBER OF REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS
EACH PRODUCER SOLD IN THE STATE IN THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR
YEAR; AND
(VI) ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(2) A PRODUCER SHALL SUBMIT A COMPLETED REGISTRATION FORM
TO THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION THAT REPRESENTS
THE PRODUCER.
(E) ON A SCHEDULE DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT, EACH PRODUCER
SHALL PAY A REGISTRATION FEE ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER
SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION.
(F) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH AN ANNUAL REGISTRATION
FEE FOR PRODUCERS THAT SELL REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS IN THE
STATE.
(2) THE REGISTRATION FEE SHALL BE SET IN A MANNER THAT:
(I) WHEN TAKEN IN COMBINATION WITH ANTICIPATED
REVENUES FROM PENALTIES COLLECTED UNDER § 9–1755 OF THIS SUBTITLE, WILL
PRODUCE FUNDS SUFFICIENT TO COVER THE DEPARTMENT’S ESTIMATED COSTS OF
PLANNING, IMPLEMENTING, ADMINISTERING, MONITORING, ENFORCING, AND

HOUSE BILL 331 25
EVALUATING THE PROGRAM FOR THE UPCOMING YEAR;
(II) FOR THE FIRST YEAR OF THE PROGRAM DURING WHICH
REGISTRATION FEES ARE COLLECTED, SHALL COVER THE START–UP COSTS OF THE
PROGRAM THAT WERE INCURRED BY THE DEPARTMENT AND FINANCED FROM THE
GENERAL FUND; AND
(III) IS PROPORTIONAL TO A PRODUCER’S SHARE OF THE TOTAL
NUMBER OF REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS SOLD IN THE STATE FOR THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) IF THE REVENUES FROM THE REGISTRATION FEES IN THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING YEAR EXCEED THE COSTS SPECIFIED IN PARAGRAPH
(2)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION, CARRY THE EXCESS REVENUES FORWARD TO REDUCE
REGISTRATION FEES THE FOLLOWING YEAR; AND
(II) IF THE REVENUES FROM THE REGISTRATION FEES IN THE
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING YEAR DO NOT COVER THE COSTS SPECIFIED IN
PARAGRAPH (2)(I) OF THIS SUBSECTION, ADJUST REGISTRATION FEES FOR THE
FOLLOWING YEAR TO AN AMOUNT THAT WILL COVER THE DEPARTMENT’S ACTUAL
COSTS FROM THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING YEAR.
(4) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, REGISTRATION FEES COLLECTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE:
1. TRANSFERRED TO THE STATE RECYCLING TRUST
FUND UNDER § 9–1707(F) OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
2. USED ONLY TO COVER THE DEPARTMENT’S COSTS OF
PLANNING, IMPLEMENTING, ADMINISTERING, MONITORING, ENFORCING, AND
EVALUATING THE PROGRAM.
(II) THE PORTION OF THE REGISTRATION FEES THAT COVERED
THE START–UP COSTS OF THE PROGRAM AND WERE FINANCED FROM THE GENERAL
FUND DURING THE FIRST YEAR OF THE PROGRAM FOR WHICH REGISTRATION FEES
ARE COLLECTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (2)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL BE DEPOSITED INTO THE GENERAL FUND.
9–1745.
(A) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL APPROVE,

HOUSE BILL 331
FOR A PERIOD NOT TO EXCEED 10 YEARS, A SINGLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER
STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION TO REPRESENT ALL PRODUCERS IN FULFILLING THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS PART, IF THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP
ORGANIZATION DEMONSTRATES THAT IT HAS:
(1) THE ABILITY, AS DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT, TO
ADMINISTER THE REQUIREMENTS OF A BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP PLAN
UNDER § 9–1746 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) A GOVERNING BOARD CONSISTING OF PRODUCERS THAT
REPRESENT THE DIVERSITY OF APPLICABLE REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS
IN THE MARKET;
(3) SET NO UNREASONABLE BARRIERS TO JOINING THE BEVERAGE
CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION AND WILL TAKE INTO CONSIDERATION
THE NEEDS OF SMALL PRODUCERS THAT DO NOT GENERATE A HIGH VOLUME OF
CONTAINERS;
(4) ADEQUATE FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY AND SAFEGUARDS,
INCLUDING FRAUD PREVENTION MEASURES AND AN AUDIT SCHEDULE;
(5) THE ABILITY TO SECURE THE CAPITAL NECESSARY FOR THE
INITIAL INVESTMENT IN INFRASTRUCTURE, SORTING EQUIPMENT, SOFTWARE,
TRANSPORTATION, AND OTHER START–UP EXPENSES; AND
(6) MET ANY OTHER REQUIREMENTS SET BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(B) IF NO APPLICATION TO OPERATE A BEVERAGE CONTAINER
STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION IS SUBMITTED BY PRODUCERS TO THE DEPARTMENT
BY OCTOBER 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) ESTABLISH OR DESIGNATE A BEVERAGE CONTAINER
STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION TO IMPLEMENT THIS PART; AND
(2) REQUIRE ALL PRODUCERS, AS A CONDITION OF SELLING OR
DISTRIBUTING BEVERAGES IN THE STATE, TO JOIN AND FUND THE DESIGNATED
ORGANIZATION.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT MAY RENEW THE APPROVAL OF THE BEVERAGE
CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION IF THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION CONTINUES
TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION AND ANY OTHER REQUIREMENT SET
BY THE DEPARTMENT.

HOUSE BILL 331 27
(D) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REVOKE THE APPROVAL OF THE
BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION IF THE DEPARTMENT
DETERMINES THAT THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION:
(I) FAILED TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION; OR
(II) FAILED TO IMPLEMENT AND ADMINISTER AN APPROVED
BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP PLAN IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–1746 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) IF THE DEPARTMENT REVOKES THE APPROVAL OF THE
BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) THE DEPARTMENT MAY APPROVE ONE OR MORE
ADDITIONAL BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATIONS TO CARRY OUT
THE RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP
ORGANIZATION THAT WAS REVOKED, SUBJECT TO ONE OR MORE OF THE
ADDITIONAL BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATIONS MEETING THE
REQUIREMENTS SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) THE TRUSTEE OR ESCROW AGENT OF THE TRUST FUND OR
ESCROW ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED IN THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP
PLAN UNDER § 9–1746(A)(3)(VI) OF THIS SUBTITLE SHALL:
1. RECEIVE ALL PAYMENTS DIRECTLY FROM
PRODUCERS THAT WOULD HAVE BEEN PAID TO THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER
STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION;
2. DEPOSIT THE PAYMENTS RECEIVED UNDER ITEM 1 OF
THIS ITEM INTO THE TRUST FUND OR ESCROW ACCOUNT; AND
3. MAKE PAYMENTS FROM THE TRUST FUND OR ESCROW
ACCOUNT AS DIRECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO IMPLEMENT THE REQUIREMENTS
OF THIS PART.
9–1746.
(A) (1) ON OR BEFORE MARCH 1, 2028, THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER
STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION SHALL SUBMIT A BEVERAGE CONTAINER
STEWARDSHIP PLAN TO THE DEPARTMENT.

HOUSE BILL 331
(2) A BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP PLAN SHALL:
(I) IDENTIFY AND INCLUDE THE CONTACT INFORMATION FOR
EACH PRODUCER INTENDED TO BE COVERED UNDER THE PLAN;
(II) IDENTIFY EACH BRAND OF REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE
CONTAINER INTENDED TO BE SOLD UNDER THE PLAN, INCLUDING THE SIZE AND
MATERIAL OF THE REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS FOR EACH BRAND AND
WHETHER THE REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS ARE REFILLABLE;
(III) DESCRIBE:
1. THE FINANCING INFORMATION SPECIFIED IN
PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION;
2. THE LOCATION AND DISTRIBUTION OF
ACCOUNT–BASED BULK PROCESSING PROGRAMS, BAG DROP PROGRAMS, AND
REDEMPTION FACILITIES THE ORGANIZATION WILL DEVELOP, AS NECESSARY TO:
A. COMPLY WITH THE CONVENIENCE STANDARDS
ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER § 9–1752 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
B. ACHIEVE THE PERFORMANCE TARGETS UNDER §
9–1740 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
3. HOW THE PERFORMANCE TARGETS WILL BE MET OR
EXCEEDED FOR THE 5–YEAR PERIOD FOLLOWING THE YEAR IN WHICH THE PLAN IS
APPROVED;
4. HOW STAKEHOLDER COMMENTS WERE CONSIDERED
AND REFLECTED IN THE DEVELOPMENT OF THE PLAN, INCLUDING THE ROLE OF
RETAILERS, DISTRIBUTORS, AND LOCAL GOVERNMENTS IN PLAN IMPLEMENTATION;
5. THE ADMINISTRATION AND IMPLEMENTATION OF
THE PLAN, INCLUDING ANY STAFFING THAT WILL BE NECESSARY FOR THESE
PURPOSES;
6. THE ACTIONS THAT HAVE BEEN TAKEN AND THAT
WILL BE TAKEN FOR PUBLIC OUTREACH, EDUCATION, AND COMMUNICATION,
INCLUDING MESSAGING AND IDENTIFICATION OF TARGET AUDIENCES;
7. THE ANTICIPATED INVESTMENTS THAT WILL BE
MADE TO IMPROVE THE REUSE OF BEVERAGE CONTAINERS, INCLUDING THE

HOUSE BILL 331 29
SOURCE OF FUNDING FOR THE INVESTMENTS; AND
8. THE ACTIONS THE ORGANIZATION WILL TAKE TO
ENSURE THE PLAN IS IMPLEMENTED IN A MANNER THAT COMPLIES WITH THE
REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (D)(2) OF THIS SECTION;
(IV) LIST THE STAKEHOLDERS CONSULTED IN DEVELOPING THE
PLAN;
(V) PROVIDE THE ANTICIPATED COSTS OF IMPLEMENTING THE
PLAN FOR 5 YEARS, BROKEN DOWN BY YEAR;
(VI) INCLUDE A CLOSURE AND TRANSFER PLAN FOR HANDLING
THE AFFAIRS OF THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION THAT
ENSURES THAT EACH PRODUCER INTENDED TO BE COVERED UNDER THE BEVERAGE
CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP PLAN CAN FULFILL THE PRODUCER’S OBLIGATIONS IN
THE EVENT THAT THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION
DISSOLVES OR HAS ITS APPROVAL REVOKED UNDER § 9–1745 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
AND
(VII) INCLUDE ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUESTED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(3) THE FINANCING INFORMATION INCLUDED IN A BEVERAGE
CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP PLAN SHALL:
(I) EXPLAIN THE FINANCING FOR DIRECT INVESTMENTS OR
REIMBURSEMENTS THAT WILL IMPROVE INFRASTRUCTURE IN A MANNER THAT
SUPPORTS REDEMPTION SERVICES AND TECHNOLOGIES;
(II) ESTABLISH A FEE STRUCTURE IN ACCORDANCE WITH
PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR PRODUCERS PARTICIPATING IN THE
BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION;
(III) DESCRIBE THE COSTS OF MEETING THE PERFORMANCE
TARGETS;
(IV) DESCRIBE THE INCENTIVES USED TO ENCOURAGE
PRODUCERS TO:
1. INVEST IN REUSABLE AND REFILLABLE BEVERAGE
CONTAINER SYSTEMS; AND

HOUSE BILL 331
2. REDESIGN BEVERAGE CONTAINERS TO BE EASIER
AND LESS COSTLY TO RECYCLE;
(V) CREATE INCENTIVES FOR PRODUCERS TO USE A
MARYLAND–SPECIFIC UPC BARCODE TO REDUCE FRAUDULENT REDEMPTION;
(VI) ESTABLISH A TRUST FUND OR AN ESCROW ACCOUNT IN THE
STATE INTO WHICH THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION
SHALL DEPOSIT ALL UNEXPENDED FUNDS FOR USE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SECTION IN THE EVENT THAT THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP
ORGANIZATION DISSOLVES OR HAS ITS APPROVAL REVOKED BY THE DEPARTMENT
UNDER § 9–1745 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(VII) MEET ANY OTHER REQUIREMENTS ESTABLISHED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(4) (I) THE FEE STRUCTURE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF
THIS SUBSECTION FOR PRODUCERS PARTICIPATING IN THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER
STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION SHALL BE:
1. SET IN A MANNER THAT COVERS THE COSTS OF
ADMINISTERING THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION AND
IMPLEMENTING THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP PLAN; AND
2. BASED ON:
A. THE COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH TRANSPORTING,
COLLECTING, AND PROCESSING EACH TYPE OF REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE
CONTAINER MATERIAL;
B. WHETHER A PRODUCER’S REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE
CONTAINERS ARE REFILLABLE;
C. WHETHER A PRODUCER’S EMPTY REDEEMABLE
BEVERAGE CONTAINERS ARE EASY TO RECYCLE;
D. WHETHER A PRODUCER’S REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE
CONTAINERS HAVE A MARYLAND–SPECIFIC UPC BARCODE;
E. A PRODUCER’S PORTION, BY MATERIAL TYPE, OF
REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS SOLD IN THE STATE DURING THE PREVIOUS
CALENDAR YEAR; AND

HOUSE BILL 331 31
F. ANY OTHER FACTOR THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES
IS NECESSARY TO SUPPORT THE PROGRAM.
(II) 1. EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 9–1745(D)(2) OF THIS
SUBTITLE, A PRODUCER PARTICIPATING IN THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER
STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION SHALL PAY THE FEE ESTABLISHED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP
ORGANIZATION.
2. THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP
ORGANIZATION SHALL DEPOSIT FEES RECEIVED UNDER THIS SUBPARAGRAPH TO AN
ACCOUNT HELD BY THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION.
3. THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP
ORGANIZATION MAY USE THE FEES RECEIVED UNDER THIS SUBPARAGRAPH ONLY
FOR IMPLEMENTING THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP PLAN.
(5) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT A BEVERAGE CONTAINER
STEWARDSHIP PLAN TO AN INDEPENDENT FINANCIAL AUDITOR TO ENSURE THAT
THE FINANCING PROPOSED IN THE PLAN WILL COVER THE COSTS OF IMPLEMENTING
THE PLAN.
(B) (1) (I) WITHIN 120 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF A BEVERAGE
CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP PLAN SUBMITTED TO THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS
SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL APPROVE, APPROVE WITH CONDITIONS, OR
DENY THE PLAN.
(II) IN DETERMINING WHETHER TO APPROVE, APPROVE WITH
CONDITIONS, OR DENY A BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP PLAN, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL:
1. CONSIDER WHETHER:
A. THE PLAN COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS SECTION; AND
B. THERE WAS SUFFICIENT ENGAGEMENT WITH
STAKEHOLDERS, INCLUDING LOCAL GOVERNMENTS, RETAILERS, DISTRIBUTORS,
AND ON–PREMISES SELLERS, IN DEVELOPING THE PLAN; AND
2. CONSULT WITH THE ADVISORY COUNCIL.
(2) (I) THE DEPARTMENT MAY RESCIND APPROVAL OF A

HOUSE BILL 331
BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP PLAN FOR GOOD CAUSE.
(II) THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION
MAY AMEND A RESCINDED BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP PLAN AND SUBMIT
THE AMENDED PLAN TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR APPROVAL.
(3) (I) A BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP PLAN APPROVED
BY THE DEPARTMENT MAY BE AMENDED WITH APPROVAL OF THE DEPARTMENT.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REQUIRE THAT AN APPROVED
BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP PLAN BE AMENDED IF THE REPORT
SUBMITTED UNDER § 9–1747 OF THIS SUBTITLE REFLECTS THAT THE
PERFORMANCE TARGETS HAVE NOT BEEN MET.
(C) AN APPROVED BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP PLAN EXPIRES AT
THE END OF 5 YEARS.
(D) (1) THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION
SHALL IMPLEMENT AND ADMINISTER A BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP PLAN
WITHIN 6 MONTHS AFTER THE PLAN IS APPROVED.
(2) IN IMPLEMENTING AND ADMINISTERING A BEVERAGE CONTAINER
STEWARDSHIP PLAN, THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION
SHALL:
(I) FACILITATE LOGISTICS, THE INITIATION OF DEPOSITS, AND
THE ISSUANCE OF REFUNDS UNDER THE PLAN;
(II) COORDINATE THE LOGISTICS FOR TIMELY COLLECTION OF
REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS FROM AN ON–PREMISES SELLER;
(III) ESTABLISH PROCEDURES FOR TRACKING REDEEMABLE
BEVERAGE CONTAINERS SOLD IN THE STATE;
(IV) DESIGN AND OPERATE SERVICES FOR THE
TRANSPORTATION AND PROCESSING OF REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS;
(V) DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A PLAN FOR ESTABLISHING,
OPERATING, AND MANAGING REDEMPTION FACILITIES THAT WILL OFFER A WIDE
RANGE OF CONVENIENT REDEMPTION LOCATIONS AND TECHNOLOGIES THAT ARE
EASY TO USE, ACCESSIBLE, AND MEET OR EXCEED THE CONVENIENCE STANDARDS
ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER § 9–1752 OF THIS SUBTITLE;

HOUSE BILL 331 33
(VI) DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A PLAN FOR THE DISTRIBUTION,
OPERATION, AND MAINTENANCE OF BEVERAGE CONTAINER REDEMPTION AND
PROCESSING METHODS, INCLUDING REVERSE VENDING MACHINES, BAG DROP
PROGRAMS, AND ACCOUNT–BASED BULK PROCESSING PROGRAMS;
(VII) DEVELOP ACCOUNTING AND CONTROL STANDARDS;
(VIII) IMPLEMENT ACCOUNTING, AUDIT, PAYMENT, AND
REPORTING PROCEDURES;
(IX) ESTABLISH A HIGH–VOLUME VALIDATION AND AUDIT
SYSTEM TO PAY A BULK RATE TO AN ON–PREMISES SELLER FOR THE REDEMPTION
OF EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS;
(X) ESTABLISH AN APPLICATION PROCESS FOR LARGE
ON–PREMISES SELLERS TO APPLY FOR AND RECEIVE A BULK RATE FOR THE
REDEMPTION OF HIGH VOLUMES OF EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS;
(XI) MARKET REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER MATERIALS
FOR REUSE IN THE MANUFACTURING OF SIMILAR PRODUCTS;
(XII) FUND A MARKETING PROGRAM TO EDUCATE THE PUBLIC
ABOUT THE PROGRAM;
(XIII) ESTABLISH A SYSTEM FOR REPORTING KEY INFORMATION
GATHERED BY THE PROGRAM TO THE DEPARTMENT ON A QUARTERLY BASIS; AND
(XIV) CREATE INCENTIVES FOR THE DEVELOPMENT OF
REFILLABLE AND REUSABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER SYSTEMS.
(3) ON REQUEST OF THE DEPARTMENT, THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER
STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION SHALL SUBMIT A COPY OF ITS FINANCIAL RECORDS
TO THE DEPARTMENT FOR A FINANCIAL AUDIT.
9–1747.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP
ORGANIZATION THAT HAS A BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP PLAN APPROVED
BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER § 9–1746 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) ON OR BEFORE APRIL 1 EACH YEAR, BEGINNING IN 2030, THE
BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO
THE DEPARTMENT ON THE PROGRESS MADE IN THE PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR

HOUSE BILL 331
TOWARD MEETING THE PERFORMANCE TARGETS AND THE GOALS OF THE PROGRAM
AND THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION’S BEVERAGE
CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP PLAN.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE THE ADVISORY COUNCIL
WITH A COPY OF EACH REPORT SUBMITTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(C) THE REPORT SUBMITTED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL INCLUDE, FOR THE PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR:
(1) THE PROGRESS MADE TOWARD ACHIEVING THE PERFORMANCE
TARGETS;
(2) IF THE PERFORMANCE TARGETS WERE NOT ACHIEVED, A
DESCRIPTION OF THE ACTIONS PROPOSED TO ACHIEVE THE PERFORMANCE
TARGETS;
(3) THE NUMBER OF REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS SOLD IN
THE STATE;
(4) THE NUMBER OF REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS SOLD IN
THE STATE SORTED BY MATERIAL TYPE, REFUND VALUE, AND WHETHER THE
CONTAINER CAN BE REFILLED OR REUSED;
(5) THE NUMBER OF EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS
REDEEMED;
(6) THE NUMBER OF EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS
REDEEMED AT EACH REDEMPTION FACILITY, REVERSE VENDING MACHINE, BAG
DROP PROGRAM, ACCOUNT–BASED BULK PROCESSING PROGRAM, OR OTHER
BEVERAGE CONTAINER REDEMPTION AND PROCESSING METHOD SORTED BY
MATERIAL TYPE, REFUND VALUE, AND WHETHER THE EMPTY REDEEMABLE
BEVERAGE CONTAINER CAN BE REFILLED OR REUSED;
(7) THE REDEMPTION RATE AND RECYCLING RATE FOR
NONREFILLABLE REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS SOLD IN THE STATE
SORTED BY MATERIAL TYPE, NUMBER OF CONTAINERS SOLD, AND CONTAINER
WEIGHT;
(8) THE AMOUNT OF EACH TYPE OF:
(I) REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER MATERIAL
COLLECTED IN THE STATE; AND

HOUSE BILL 331 35
(II) SCRAP MATERIAL SOLD BY THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER
STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION;
(9) THE LOCATION OF EACH REDEMPTION FACILITY IN THE STATE
AND THE REDEMPTION METHOD USED AT EACH REDEMPTION FACILITY;
(10) A DESCRIPTION OF ANY IMPROVEMENTS MADE TO MAKE
RETURNING EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS EASIER AND MORE
CONVENIENT;
(11) THE IDENTIFICATION AND DESCRIPTION OF AREAS THAT DO NOT
HAVE READILY AVAILABLE OPTIONS FOR REDEEMING AN EMPTY REDEEMABLE
BEVERAGE CONTAINER AND ACTIONS THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP
ORGANIZATION WILL TAKE TO IMPROVE OPTIONS IN THESE AREAS;
(12) THE NUMBER OF CONSUMER COMPLAINTS PER MONTH, SORTED
BY REDEMPTION FACILITY;
(13) THE NUMBER AND TYPE OF COMPLAINTS FROM ON–PREMISES
SELLERS PER MONTH, SORTED BY TYPE OF BUSINESS;
(14) THE NUMBER OF INDIVIDUALS AND ORGANIZATIONS WITH
ACCOUNTS ESTABLISHED FOR THE RECEIPT OF ELECTRONIC DEPOSITS OR
REFUNDS;
(15) THE TOTAL COST OF IMPLEMENTING THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER
STEWARDSHIP PLAN, AS DETERMINED BY AN INDEPENDENT FINANCIAL AUDITOR
UNDER § 9–1746(A)(5) OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(16) THE AVERAGE COST OF PROCESSING AN EMPTY REDEEMED
REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER;
(17) A COPY OF THE AUDIT CONDUCTED UNDER § 9–1746(A)(5) OF
THIS SUBTITLE;
(18) FINANCIAL STATEMENTS DETAILING ALL DEPOSITS RECEIVED
AND REFUNDS ISSUED BY EACH PRODUCER COVERED UNDER THE BEVERAGE
CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP PLAN;
(19) THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF DEPOSITS INITIATED, REFUNDS ISSUED,
AND UNCLAIMED DEPOSITS COLLECTED UNDER THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER
STEWARDSHIP PLAN;

HOUSE BILL 331
(20) AN ACCOUNTING OF ALL ACTIVITIES AND INVESTMENTS
FINANCED BY UNCLAIMED DEPOSITS;
(21) EXPENDITURES AND REVENUES SORTED BY SOURCE, INCLUDING
FEES PAID UNDER § 9–1746(A)(4) OF THIS SUBTITLE, REVENUE FROM THE SALE OF
SCRAP MATERIALS, AND UNCLAIMED DEPOSITS;
(22) SAMPLES OF ALL EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS PROVIDED TO
CONSUMERS, RETAILERS, AND OTHER ENTITIES;
(23) A DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF INVESTMENTS MADE IN NEW
REDEMPTION FACILITIES AND REDEMPTION METHODS;
(24) THE LOCATION OF NEW REDEMPTION FACILITIES AND
REDEMPTION METHODS;
(25) A DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF CHANGES MADE BY PRODUCERS TO
INCREASE THE RECYCLABILITY OF REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS;
(26) A DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF ANY INCIDENTS OF FRAUD AND
EFFORTS TAKEN TO PREVENT FRAUD; AND
(27) ANY OTHER INFORMATION REQUIRED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(D) THE FINANCIAL, PRODUCTION, AND SALES DATA OF INDIVIDUAL
PRODUCERS REPORTED TO THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE
KEPT CONFIDENTIAL BY THE DEPARTMENT AND THE ADVISORY COUNCIL.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL POST THE REPORT SUBMITTED UNDER THIS
SECTION ON THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE IN A MANNER THAT PROTECTS THE
CONFIDENTIALITY OF THE DATA SPECIFIED UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS
SECTION.
9–1748.
(A) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH A PROCESS FOR A COUNTY
OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION TO CREATE A REDEMPTION FACILITY.
(2) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION MAY NOT BE REQUIRED
TO HOST, OPERATE, OR PROVIDE LAND, FACILITIES, OR ANY OTHER RESOURCES FOR
THE ESTABLISHMENT OR OPERATION OF ANY REDEMPTION FACILITY.

HOUSE BILL 331 37
(B) EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS REDEEMED AT A
REDEMPTION FACILITY MANAGED BY A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION
SHALL BE CREDITED TOWARD MEETING THE RECYCLING RATES REQUIRED UNDER §
9–505 OF THIS TITLE.
(C) (1) THROUGH DECEMBER 31, 2031, A PORTION OF PROGRAM
REVENUES SHALL BE USED TO COMPENSATE A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION FOR ANY NET LOSS OF REVENUE TO THE COUNTY’S OR MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION’S WASTE MANAGEMENT SYSTEM THAT CAN BE DOCUMENTED AND
ATTRIBUTED TO THE PROGRAM.
(2) IN DETERMINING A NET LOSS OF REVENUE, A COUNTY OR
MUNICIPAL CORPORATION SHALL CONSIDER:
(I) THE LOSS OF REVENUE FROM THE SALE OF SCRAP
MATERIALS;
(II) FINANCIAL SAVINGS FROM A REDUCTION IN:
1. GLASS BOTTLES IN THE RECYCLING STREAM;
2. TRANSPORTATION COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH
CURBSIDE COLLECTION OF TRASH AND RECYCLING;
3. PROCESSING COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH RECYCLING
BEVERAGE CONTAINERS;
4. THE COSTS OF LANDFILLING AND INCINERATING
BEVERAGE CONTAINERS THAT ARE NOT RECYCLED; AND
5. THE COSTS OF LITTER COLLECTION; AND
(III) FOR A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION THAT HAS A
TOTAL MAXIMUM DAILY LOAD FOR TRASH IN A WATERWAY UNDER ITS
JURISDICTION, THE REDUCED COSTS AND INCREASED BENEFITS OF COMPLYING
WITH THE TOTAL MAXIMUM DAILY LOAD DUE TO A REDUCTION IN BEVERAGE
CONTAINER LITTER.
9–1749.
FUNDING FOR THE PROGRAM SHALL:
(1) INCLUDE:

HOUSE BILL 331
(I) REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP
ORGANIZATION FEES COLLECTED UNDER § 9–1746 OF THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) REVENUE FROM THE SALE OF RAW MATERIALS;
(III) UNCLAIMED DEPOSITS COLLECTED UNDER § 9–1743 OF
THIS SUBTITLE;
(IV) REGISTRATION FEES COLLECTED UNDER § 9–1744 OF THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
(V) PENALTIES COLLECTED UNDER § 9–1755 OF THIS
SUBTITLE; AND
(2) BE USED IN ACCORDANCE WITH §§ 9–1707(F), 9–1743, 9–1744,
AND 9–1755 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
9–1750.
(A) THERE IS A BEVERAGE CONTAINER RECYCLING REFUND GRANT
PROGRAM.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE GRANT PROGRAM IS TO PROVIDE FUNDING FOR:
(1) AN ASSESSMENT OF THE INVESTMENTS AND POLICIES
NECESSARY TO ENSURE THAT, BY DECEMBER 31, 2038, AT LEAST 10% OF ALL
BEVERAGE CONTAINERS SOLD IN THE STATE ARE RETURNED AND REFILLED; AND
(2) PROJECTS THAT:
(I) INCREASE THE REUSE AND RECYCLING OF BEVERAGE
CONTAINERS IN THE STATE;
(II) INCREASE THE AVAILABILITY OF PUBLIC WATER
FOUNTAINS AND REFILL STATIONS IN THE STATE; AND
(III) REDUCE THE VOLUME OF LITTER FROM BEVERAGE
CONTAINERS IN THE STATE.
(C) THE CHESAPEAKE BAY TRUST SHALL ADMINISTER THE GRANT
PROGRAM.

HOUSE BILL 331 39
(D) THE GRANT PROGRAM SHALL BE FUNDED FROM A PORTION OF THE
UNCLAIMED DEPOSITS TRANSFERRED TO THE CHESAPEAKE BAY TRUST UNDER §
9–1743(D)(4)(II) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(E) THE FOLLOWING ENTITIES ARE ELIGIBLE FOR A GRANT UNDER THE
GRANT PROGRAM:
(1) A SCHOOL OR AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION;
(2) A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION;
(3) A COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION;
(4) A FOR–PROFIT ORGANIZATION; AND
(5) A PUBLIC–PRIVATE PARTNERSHIP.
(F) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE ADVISORY COUNCIL,
SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING:
(1) AN APPLICATION PROCESS FOR AN ENTITY TO APPLY FOR A
GRANT;
(2) THE CRITERIA FOR EVALUATING AND AWARDING GRANTS;
(3) REPORTING AND EVALUATION REQUIREMENTS FOR A GRANT
AWARDED UNDER THIS SECTION; AND
(4) ANY OTHER REQUIREMENTS THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES
ARE NECESSARY FOR ADMINISTERING AND IMPLEMENTING GRANTS AWARDED
UNDER THE GRANT PROGRAM.
(G) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2030, THE CHESAPEAKE BAY TRUST SHALL
BEGIN AWARDING GRANTS UNDER THE GRANT PROGRAM.
9–1751.
(A) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2029, AND CONTINUING UNTIL
REIMBURSEMENT PAYMENTS UNDER § 9–2506 OF THIS TITLE BEGIN, THE BEVERAGE
CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION SHALL PROVIDE PAYMENTS TO A
MATERIAL RECOVERY FACILITY TO COVER THE COSTS OF COLLECTING, SORTING,
PROCESSING, AND TRANSPORTING EMPTY UNREDEEMED REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE
CONTAINERS FOR RECYCLING, REUSE, OR REFILLING.

HOUSE BILL 331
(B) A MATERIAL RECOVERY FACILITY SHALL BE ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE A
PAYMENT UNDER THIS SECTION ONLY IF:
(1) THE UNREDEEMED REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS
RECEIVED MEET THE APPLICABLE SPECIFICATIONS IN THE MOST RECENTLY
PUBLISHED GUIDELINES OF THE INSTITUTE OF SCRAP RECYCLING INDUSTRIES;
(2) THE MATERIAL RECOVERY FACILITY REPORTS TO THE BEVERAGE
CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION THE NUMBER OF TONS OF UNREDEEMED
REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS RECEIVED FOR PROCESSING IN THE
PREVIOUS MONTH, CATEGORIZED BY MATERIAL TYPE; AND
(3) THE MATERIAL RECOVERY FACILITY REPORTS TO THE BEVERAGE
CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION THE NUMBER OF UNREDEEMED
REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS TRANSFERRED TO ADDITIONAL MATERIALS
PROCESSING FACILITIES OR END MARKETS IN THE PREVIOUS MONTH, CATEGORIZED
BY MATERIAL TYPE.
(C) THE OPERATOR OF A MATERIAL RECOVERY FACILITY SHALL USE AN
INDUSTRY–STANDARD SCALE TO MEASURE THE WEIGHT OF ALL COVERED
BEVERAGE CONTAINER MATERIALS RECEIVED BY THE FACILITY.
(D) THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION MAY, AT ITS
OWN EXPENSE, CONDUCT AUDITS OF THE QUALITY AND QUANTITY OF MATERIALS
HANDLED BY A MATERIAL RECOVERY FACILITY, ON REQUEST BY THE
ORGANIZATION.
(E) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH THE PAYMENT AMOUNT
UNDER THIS SECTION.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADJUST THE PAYMENT AMOUNT AS
NECESSARY TO ACCOUNT FOR CHANGES IN THE COSTS OF COLLECTING, SORTING,
PROCESSING, AND TRANSPORTING EMPTY UNREDEEMED REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE
CONTAINERS.
9–1752.
IN ADDITION TO THE DUTIES AND REQUIREMENTS SPECIFIED IN THIS PART,
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE ADVISORY COUNCIL:

HOUSE BILL 331 41
(I) ESTABLISH CONVENIENCE STANDARDS FOR THE COVERAGE
AND AVAILABILITY OF REDEMPTION OPTIONS ACROSS THE STATE; AND
(II) ENSURE THE CONVENIENCE STANDARDS PROVIDE
ACCESSIBLE REDEMPTION OPTIONS FOR DIFFERENTLY ABLED PEOPLE AND PEOPLE
WHO LIVE IN RURAL AREAS OR LOW–INCOME COMMUNITIES OF COLOR;
(2) ESTABLISH A SYSTEM FOR LARGE ON–PREMISES SELLERS TO
VERIFY THE SOURCE OF THE HIGH VOLUMES OF REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE
CONTAINERS REDEEMED BY THE ON–PREMISES SELLER; AND
(3) PERIODICALLY REVIEW AVAILABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER
REDEMPTION AND PROCESSING METHODS TO DETERMINE WHETHER THE TYPES OF
BEVERAGE CONTAINERS COVERED UNDER THE PROGRAM SHOULD BE EXPANDED.
9–1753.
(A) THERE IS A REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER RECYCLING
REFUND ADVISORY COUNCIL.
(B) THE ADVISORY COUNCIL CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS,
DESIGNATED BY THE SECRETARY:
(1) ONE MEMBER REPRESENTING RECYCLING PROCESSORS;
(2) ONE MEMBER REPRESENTING LOCAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES
RESPONSIBLE FOR RECYCLING PROGRAMS;
(3) ONE MEMBER REPRESENTING GLASS MANUFACTURERS OR A
GLASS MANUFACTURING TRADE ORGANIZATION;
(4) ONE MEMBER REPRESENTING ALUMINUM MANUFACTURERS OR
AN ALUMINUM MANUFACTURING TRADE ORGANIZATION;
(5) ONE MEMBER REPRESENTING PLASTIC MANUFACTURERS OR A
PLASTIC MANUFACTURING TRADE ORGANIZATION;
(6) ONE MEMBER REPRESENTING BEVERAGE COMPANIES;
(7) ONE MEMBER REPRESENTING PURCHASERS OF RECYCLED
CONTENT;
(8) ONE MEMBER REPRESENTING RETAILERS;

HOUSE BILL 331
(9) ONE MEMBER REPRESENTING RESTAURANTS OR OTHER
ON–PREMISES SELLERS;
(10) ONE MEMBER REPRESENTING REVERSE VENDING MACHINE
BUSINESSES;
(11) ONE MEMBER REPRESENTING ACCOUNT–BASED BULK
PROCESSORS;
(12) ONE MEMBER REPRESENTING BUSINESSES INVOLVED IN REUSE
AND REFILL SYSTEMS;
(13) AT LEAST ONE MEMBER REPRESENTING AN ENVIRONMENTAL
ADVOCACY ORGANIZATION;
(14) AT LEAST ONE MEMBER REPRESENTING AN ENVIRONMENTAL
JUSTICE ADVOCACY ORGANIZATION; AND
(15) AT LEAST TWO MEMBERS WHO ARE MEMBERS OF THE GENERAL
PUBLIC AND RESIDE IN THE STATE.
(C) THE SECRETARY SHALL DESIGNATE TWO COCHAIRS FROM AMONG THE
MEMBERSHIP OF THE ADVISORY COUNCIL.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE ADVISORY
COUNCIL.
(E) A MEMBER OF THE ADVISORY COUNCIL:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
ADVISORY COUNCIL; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(F) THE ADVISORY COUNCIL SHALL MEET:
(1) AT LEAST QUARTERLY EACH YEAR; AND
(2) AS REQUESTED BY THE DEPARTMENT.
(G) THE ADVISORY COUNCIL SHALL:

HOUSE BILL 331 43
(1) ADVISE THE DEPARTMENT ON DETERMINING WHETHER TO
APPROVE A BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP PLAN;
(2) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE DEPARTMENT ON THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF APPROVED BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP PLANS;
(3) REVIEW AND ADVISE THE DEPARTMENT ON THE ANNUAL
REPORTS SUBMITTED UNDER § 9–1747 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(4) ADVISE THE DEPARTMENT ON THE IMPLEMENTATION,
ADMINISTRATION, AND PERFORMANCE OF THE PROGRAM.
9–1754.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 1, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS PART.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT MAY EXPAND THE TYPES OF BEVERAGE CONTAINERS
COVERED UNDER THE PROGRAM BY REGULATION IF, BASED ON ITS REVIEW UNDER
§ 9–1752(3) OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THERE ARE
CONVENIENT REDEMPTION OPTIONS FOR THOSE BEVERAGE CONTAINERS.
9–1755.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTIONS (C) AND (D) OF THIS SECTION,
THE PROVISIONS OF §§ 9–334 THROUGH 9–344 OF THIS TITLE APPLY TO ENFORCE
VIOLATIONS OF THIS PART.
(B) A PENALTY MAY NOT BE IMPOSED ON A PRODUCER FOR FAILING TO
PROPERLY REGISTER WITH THE DEPARTMENT UNDER § 9–1744 OF THIS SUBTITLE,
INCLUDING FAILING TO IDENTIFY EACH BRAND OF REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE
CONTAINER THAT THE PRODUCER INTENDS TO SELL, OFFER FOR SALE, OR
DISTRIBUTE IN THE STATE, UNLESS:
(1) THE DEPARTMENT FIRST ISSUES A WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE
VIOLATION TO THE PRODUCER; AND
(2) THE PRODUCER DOES NOT REGISTER WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER
RECEIVING THE WRITTEN NOTICE.
(C) (1) A PERSON MAY NOT REDEEM, ATTEMPT TO REDEEM, RECEIVE,
STORE, TRANSPORT, DISTRIBUTE, OR OTHERWISE FACILITATE OR AID IN THE

HOUSE BILL 331
REDEMPTION OF THE FOLLOWING MATERIALS WITH AN INTENT TO DEFRAUD:
(I) AN EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER THAT WAS
SOLD IN ANOTHER STATE;
(II) AN EMPTY REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE CONTAINER THAT WAS
REJECTED FOR REDEMPTION;
(III) LINE BREAKAGE;
(IV) A PREVIOUSLY REDEEMED REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE
CONTAINER; OR
(V) ANOTHER INELIGIBLE MATERIAL.
(2) A PERSON MAY NOT DISPOSE OF A REDEEMED REDEEMABLE
BEVERAGE CONTAINER IN A LANDFILL OR AN INCINERATOR.
(3) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH ADMINISTRATIVE
PENALTIES FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBSECTION THAT ARE BASED ON THE
NUMBER OF BEVERAGE CONTAINERS AND REFUND AMOUNTS INVOLVED.
(D) (1) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2032, IF THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER
STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION HAS NOT MET THE REDEMPTION RATES
ESTABLISHED IN § 9–1740 OF THIS SUBTITLE FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 2
YEARS, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ASSESS AN ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY ON THE
BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION.
(2) EACH YEAR THAT THE BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP
ORGANIZATION DOES NOT MEET THE REDEMPTION RATES ESTABLISHED IN § 9–1740
OF THIS SUBTITLE IS A SEPARATE VIOLATION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(3) AN ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTY ASSESSED UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL EQUAL THE TOTAL NUMBER OF REDEEMABLE BEVERAGE
CONTAINERS NEEDED TO BE REDEEMED TO MEET THE REDEMPTION RATES
ESTABLISHED IN § 9–1740 OF THIS SUBTITLE, MINUS THE NUMBER OF REDEEMABLE
BEVERAGE CONTAINERS ACTUALLY REDEEMED, MULTIPLIED BY THE REFUND
VALUE IN EFFECT AT THE TIME THE VIOLATION OCCURRED.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ALTER THE ADMINISTRATIVE PENALTIES
ASSESSED UNDER SUBSECTIONS (C) AND (D) OF THIS SECTION AS NECESSARY TO
ENSURE THAT THE PENALTY AMOUNTS ASSESSED EXCEED THE COSTS OF
COMPLYING WITH THIS PART.

HOUSE BILL 331 45
(F) PENALTIES COLLECTED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE:
(1) TRANSFERRED TO THE STATE RECYCLING TRUST FUND UNDER §
9–1707(F) OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(2) USED ONLY TO COVER THE DEPARTMENT’S COSTS OF PLANNING,
IMPLEMENTING, ADMINISTERING, MONITORING, ENFORCING, AND EVALUATING
THE PROGRAM.
9–1756.
ANY PERSON PARTICIPATING IN A BEVERAGE CONTAINER STEWARDSHIP
PLAN IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE IS IMMUNE FROM LIABILITY UNDER
STATE LAWS CONCERNING ANTITRUST AND RESTRAINT OF TRADE FOR
COOPERATIVE ACTIVITIES ASSOCIATED WITH THE COLLECTION, TRANSPORT,
PROCESSING, RECYCLING, REUSE, AND MANAGEMENT OF EMPTY REDEEMABLE
BEVERAGE CONTAINERS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Department of the Environment shall consult with counties and
municipalities to assess the impacts of the Maryland Beverage Container Recycling Refund
and Litter Reduction Program (Program), as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, on local
beverage container litter and recycling operations and county and municipal budgets.
(b) On or before June 1, 2027, the Department of the Environment shall report to
the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, its
recommendations on ways to offset adverse impacts and enhance positive impacts of the
Program on beverage container litter, recycling rates, and county and municipal budgets.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026.